Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Reports

271B.16-200.
Financial statements for shareholders.

Upon the written request of any shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates for shares of a corporation the corporation shall mail to such shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates its most recent financial statements showing in reasonable detail its assets and liabilities and the results of its operations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 171, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.16-210.
Other reports to shareholders — Other requirements of a public benefit corporation.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under KRS

271B.8-510

to

271B.8-540

in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the shareholders with or before the notice of the next shareholders’ meeting.

A public benefit corporation shall no less than annually provide its stockholders with a statement as to the corporation’s promotion of the public benefit or public benefits identified in the articles of incorporation and of the best interests of those materially affected by the corporation’s conduct. The statement shall include:

The objectives that the board of directors has established to promote the public benefit or public benefits and interests;

The standards that the board of directors has adopted to measure the corporation’s progress in promoting the public benefit or public benefits and interests;

Objective factual information based on those standards regarding the corporation’s success in meeting the objectives for promoting the public benefit or public benefits and interests; and

An assessment of the corporation’s success in meeting the objectives and promoting the public benefit or public benefits and interests.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a public benefit corporation may require that the corporation:

Make the statement described in subsection (2) of this section available to the public; or

Use a third-party standard in connection with, or attain a periodic third-party certification addressing, the corporation’s promotion of the public benefit or public benefits identified in the articles of incorporation or the best interests of those materially affected by the corporation’s conduct.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 172, effective January 1, 1989; 2017 ch. 28, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.16-220.
Annual report.

Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 173, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, § 74, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 74, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, §
12, effective July 15, 2011; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
56, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, both effective 7/15/2010. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together. Effective 1/1/2011, this section was also repealed and reenacted by the omnibus Kentucky Business Entity Act, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).